District of Columbia statutes.
47-1807.01

Tax on corporations — Definitions.

For purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Corporation” shall, for taxable years beginning after December 31, 1980, include financial institutions.

(2)

“Taxable income” means the amount of net income derived from sources within the District within the meaning of §§ 47-1810.01 to 47-1810.03.

(3)

“Taxable period” means a taxable year or a portion of a taxable year.

History

July 16, 1947, 61 Stat. 345, ch. 258, art. I, title VII, § 1
Sept. 26, 1984, D.C. Law 5-113, § 302(a)(1), 31 DCR 3974
Oct. 1, 1987, D.C. Law 7-29, § 2(g)(1), 34 DCR 5097
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Section References

This section is referenced in § 6-1504 and § 47-1801.04.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-1807.1.
1973 Ed., § 47-1571.

Editor's Notes

Mayor authorized to issue rules: See second paragraph of note to § 47-2601.